District of Columbia statutes.
51-121

Representation of Board in court.

(a)

On the request of the Director the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia shall represent the Director in any action in court arising under this subchapter, or in connection with the administration and enforcement of its provisions, or the rules and regulations authorized thereunder, including actions for the collection of contributions due hereunder; but in any civil action the Director may be represented by the Director’s own counsel.

(b)

Violations of any provision of this subchapter shall be prosecuted by the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia.

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 956, ch. 794, § 22
renumbered § 21, June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 124, ch. 117
Sept. 24, 1993, D.C. Law 10-15, § 219, 40 DCR 5420
1981 Ed., § 46-122.
1973 Ed., § 46-321.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 219 of District of Columbia Unemployment Compensation Comprehensive Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-260, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2330).